Utah statutes.
16-4-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Corporation" means a nonprofit corporation or a profit corporation.
(2)  "Nonprofit corporation" means a nonprofit corporation as defined in
Section 16-6a-102.
(3)  "Profit corporation" means a corporation as defined in Section
16-10a-102.
(4) "Share" means a share as defined in:
(a)  Section 16-6a-102 for a nonprofit corporation; and
(b)  Section 16-10a-102 for a profit corporation.
(5)  "Water company" means a corporation in which a shareholder has the right,
based on the shareholder's shares, to receive a proportionate share of water
delivered by the corporation.
